en: 2011 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
ca: Medalla de plata de la Societat Agrícola Alemanya el 2011
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2011
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen hopeamitali 2011
fr: Médaille d'argent 2011 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Srebrna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2011
pt: Medalha de prata da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2011

en: 2012 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2012
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen hopeamitali 2012
fr: Médaille d'argent 2012 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Srebrna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2012
pt: Medalha de prata da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2012

en: 2013 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2013
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen hopeamitali 2013
fr: Médaille d'argent 2013 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Srebrna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2013
pt: Medalha de prata da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2013

en: 2014 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2014
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen hopeamitali 2014
fr: Médaille d'argent 2014 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Srebrna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2014
pt: Medalha de prata da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2014

en: 2015 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2015
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen hopeamitali 2015
fr: Médaille d'argent 2015 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Srebrna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2015
it: Medaglia d'argento della Società Agricola Tedesca nel 2015
pt: Medalha de prata da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2015

en: 2016 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2016
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen hopeamitali 2016
fr: Médaille d'argent 2016 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Srebrna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2016
pt: Medalha de prata da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2016

en: 2017 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2017
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen hopeamitali 2017
fr: Médaille d'argent 2017 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Srebrna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2017
pt: Medalha de prata da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2017

en: 2018 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
cs: Stříbrná medaile r. 2018 Německé Zemědělské Společnosti / DLG
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2018
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen hopeamitali 2018
fr: Médaille d'argent 2018 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Srebrna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2018
it: Medaglia d'argento della Società Agricola Tedesca nel 2018
pt: Medalha de prata da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2018

en: 2019 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
cs: Stříbrná medaile r. 2019 Německé Zemědělské Společnosti / DLG
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2019
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen hopeamitali 2019
fr: Médaille d'argent 2019 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Srebrna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2019
pt: Medalha de prata da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2019

en: 2020 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
cs: Stříbrná medaile r. 2020 Německé Zemědělské Společnosti / DLG
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2020
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen hopeamitali 2020
fr: Médaille d'argent 2020 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Srebrna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2020
pt: Medalha de prata da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2020

en: 2021 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
cs: Stříbrná medaile r. 2021 Německé Zemědělské Společnosti / DLG
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2021
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen hopeamitali 2021
fr: Médaille d'argent 2021 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Srebrna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2021
pt: Medalha de prata da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2021

en: 2022 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
cs: Stříbrná medaile r. 2022 Německé Zemědělské Společnosti / DLG
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2022
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen hopeamitali 2022
fr: Médaille d'argent 2022 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Srebrna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2022
pt: Medalha de prata da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2022

en: 2023 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
cs: Stříbrná medaile r. 2023 Německé Zemědělské Společnosti / DLG
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2023
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen hopeamitali 2023
fr: Médaille d'argent 2023 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Srebrna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2023
pt: Medalha de prata da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2023

en: 2024 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2024

en: 2025 Silver medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Silberner Preis 2025

en: 2009 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2009
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali 2009
fr: Médaille d'or 2009 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2009
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2009

en: 2010 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2010
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali 2010
fr: Médaille d'or 2010 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2010
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2010

en: 2011 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2011
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali 2011
fr: Médaille d'or 2011 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2011
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2011

en: 2012 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2012
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali 2012
fr: Médaille d'or 2012 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2012
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2012

en: 2013 Gold medal of the German Agricultural Society
de: DLG Goldener Preis 2013
es: 2013 Medalla de oro de la Sociedad Agrícola Alemana
fi: Saksan maatalousyhdistyksen kultamitali 2013
fr: Médaille d'or 2013 de la Société Allemande d'Agriculture
hr: Zlatna medalja Njemačkog poljoprivrednog društva 2013
it: Medaglia d'oro della Società Agricola Tedesca nel 2013
pt: Medalha de ouro da Sociedade Agrícola Alemã de 2013